Connecticut, session 2026, SB00261.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 14-16 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A motor vehicle registration expires upon transfer of ownership
of the motor vehicle. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall enter
such expiration in the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles only
when the transferor cancels his or her registration for such motor vehicle
in accordance with procedures established by the commissioner or
when the transferee reregisters such motor vehicle with the department,
whichever occurs first.
(b) If a motor vehicle is owned by one owner who is a natural person,
such owner may designate, in writing in a space provided on the
certificate of registration for such motor vehicle, a beneficiary who shall
SB261 / File No. 645 1

SB261 File No. 645
assume ownership of such motor vehicle after the death of the owner
and upon the making of an application pursuant to this subsection. The
owner making such designation shall have all rights of ownership of
such motor vehicle during the owner's life and the beneficiary shall have
no rights in such motor vehicle until such time as the owner dies and an
application is made pursuant to this subsection. Not later than sixty
days after the death of the owner or prior to the end of the registration
period, whichever is longer, the beneficiary may make application to the
commissioner for the issuance of a certificate of title and a certificate of
registration for such motor vehicle in the beneficiary's name. Such
application shall be accompanied by: (1) The original certificate of
registration in which the beneficiary is designated pursuant to this
subsection; (2) a death certificate for the deceased owner; (3) such proof
of the beneficiary's identity as the commissioner may require; (4) the
transfer fee required by subsection (c) of this section; and (5) any
applicable fees for registration, title and number plates as required
under this chapter and chapter 247. If the beneficiary fails to make such
application within the time period specified in this subsection, the
beneficiary shall have no right to obtain ownership of and title to such
motor vehicle under this subsection after the expiration of such time
period. The right of the beneficiary to obtain ownership of and title to
such motor vehicle under this subsection shall be subordinate to the
rights of each lienholder whose security interest in such motor vehicle
is duly recorded pursuant to chapter 247. The commissioner may adopt
regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to implement the provisions
of this subsection.
(c) If the owner of a registered motor vehicle dies, the registration for
the vehicle shall, unless the vehicle is destroyed, continue in force as a
valid registration until the end of the registration period unless: (1)
Ownership of the vehicle is transferred pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section or by the deceased owner's executor, administrator, legatee or
distributee prior to the end of the registration period, in which case the
registration shall continue in force until the time of the transfer; or (2)
ownership of the vehicle is transferred to the brother, sister, father,
mother, child or spouse of the owner, in which case the registration
SB261 / File No. 645 2

SB261 File No. 645
shall, upon the payment of a fee of twenty dollars, continue in force until
the end of the registration period or until the ownership is sooner
transferred to a person other than such a relative. If at the end of the
registration period the relative has not transferred ownership of the
vehicle and the relative applies for registration of the vehicle, the
registration shall not be subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of
section 12-71b.
(d) If a motor vehicle is transferred in connection with the
organization, reorganization or dissolution, or because of the partial
liquidation, of an incorporated or unincorporated business in which
gain or loss to the transferor is not recognized for federal income tax
purposes under the Internal Revenue Code and Treasury regulations
and rulings issued thereunder, the registration of the vehicle shall, upon
the payment of a fee of twenty dollars, continue in force until the end of
the registration period or until the registration is sooner transferred to
anyone outside the original business organization. If the transferee of
the motor vehicle has not transferred ownership of the motor vehicle to
anyone outside the original business organization at the end of the
registration period and the transferee applies for a registration for the
vehicle, the registration shall not be subject to the provisions of
subsection (a) of section 12-71b.
(e) A person who transfers ownership of a registered motor vehicle
to another may have registered in his name, upon the filing of a new
application and the payment of the fee required by subsection (i) of
section 14-49, another motor vehicle for the remainder of the registration
period if the gross weight of the other motor vehicle is the same or less
than that of the transferred motor vehicle and the registration of the
transferred motor vehicle has been surrendered. If the gross weight of
the other motor vehicle is greater than the gross weight of the motor
vehicle the registration of which has been surrendered, the applicant
shall pay, in addition to such fee, the difference between the fee paid by
him for the surrendered registration and the fee for the registration of
the motor vehicle of greater gross weight. The minimum fee for any such
transfer shall be twenty dollars.
SB261 / File No. 645 3

SB261 File No. 645
(f) Any person may transfer an unexpired registration of a motor
vehicle such person owns or leases for a period of one year or more, to
another motor vehicle owned or so leased by such person upon payment
of the fee required by subsection (i) of section 14-49. Any person
transferring such a leased motor vehicle shall provide the commissioner
with evidence that the lessor has granted permission for such transfer.
If a transfer is made to a motor vehicle of greater gross weight or from
one class of registration to another, credit shall be given toward the new
registration in accordance with schedules established by the
commissioner. The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance
with chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(g) Any person who sells any motor vehicle, other than a new motor
vehicle, for which a certificate of title has not been issued and which is
not registered under the provisions of subsections (e) or (g) of section
14-12, shall, within forty-eight hours of the sale, certify under oath to the
commissioner, on blanks provided by him, such information as the
commissioner may require. Until the commissioner receives the
certification under oath required by this subsection, he shall not issue a
100 registration other than for a new motor vehicle and shall not renew a
101 registration other than for the same owner.
102 (h) Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this
103 section shall be subject to the penalty provided for false statement. Any
104 person who violates any provision of subsection (g) of this section shall,
105 for a first offense, be deemed to have committed an infraction, and, for
106 a subsequent offense, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars
107 or imprisoned not more than one year or both.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-16
JUD Joint Favorable
SB261 / File No. 645 4

SB261 File No. 645
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates a secondary deadline by which a beneficiary
designated on a motor vehicle registration certificate must transfer the
vehicle after the death of the owner. This does not result in a fiscal
impact because it is not expected to change the number of vehicles
registered in any municipality for property tax purposes.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB261 / File No. 645 5

SB261 File No. 645
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 261
AN ACT CONCERNING TRANSFER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE
REGISTRATION UPON THE DEATH OF THE OWNER OF THE
VEHICLE.